Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.108.005

Findings.

The legislature recognizes the benefit to our state and nation of providing equal educational opportunities for all races and nationalities. The legislature finds that American Indian students are underrepresented in Washington's colleges and universities. The legislature also finds that past discriminatory practices have resulted in this underrepresentation. Creating an endowed scholarship program to help American Indian students obtain a higher education will help to rectify past discrimination by providing a means and an incentive for American Indian students to pursue a higher education. The state will benefit from contributions made by American Indians who participate in a program of higher education.

[ 1990 c 287 s 1.]